Illinois, session 104th, SB3016.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Space Lands Acquisition and 5Development Act is amended by adding Section 5.5 as follows: 6    (525 ILCS 35/5.5 new)7    Sec. 5.5. Accessibility; universal design elements. The 8Department shall prioritize projects that incorporate 9universal design elements. The Department shall adopt rules to 10establish the priorities and scoring matrix under this Section 11within its grant application review process under this Act. In 12this Section, "universal design elements" includes, but is not 13limited to, the following elements:14        (1) poured-in-place rubber surfacing or synthetic turf 15    for enhanced mobility and continuously accessible 16    surfacing routes;17        (2) multiple access points and routes suitable for 18    wheelchairs, including additional ramps for seamless entry 19    to play equipment;20        (3) a variety of ground-level and elevated play 21    components accessible to individuals with diverse physical 22    abilities;23        (4) inclusive swings and seating;  SB3016 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18748 BDA 32191 b1        (5) a variety of single and multi-sensory play 2    elements, such as tactile panels and musical features;3        (6) shaded areas to accommodate individuals with 4    sensory sensitivities; and5        (7) any other construction, material, design, product, 6    or technology as set out in administrative rule.